North Carolina, session 2025, HB927.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of Durham as follows:
(1) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for maintenance and equipment
needs for city parks.
(2) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for expansion of landfills.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Durham County to be used to enhance
and upgrade County wastewater utility infrastructure in the Research Triangle Park area to
support economic development and growth.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars ($237,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The Stagville
Memorial Project to support the design and development of an art installation honoring the
history of the Stagville descendants on a plot of land across from the Museum of Durham History
in the City of Durham.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)
in nonrecurring funds to be allocated to Durham County for the repair and improvement of
orphan roads, in non-municipal areas of the county, to meet Department of Transportation
minimum construction requirements for addition to the State highway system.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of five hundred three thousand four hundred eighty-one dollars
($503,481) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of fourteen million
four thousand three hundred ninety-three dollars ($14,004,393) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to provide 219 total positions statewide for staffing needs to implement
the eCourts system to maintain court efficiency, reduce case processing delays, prevent case
backlog, and ensure timely service to citizens.
*H927-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 6. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Durham County for staffing,
operational costs, and legal resource materials needed to establish a legal support center, modeled
after Wake County's center, to provide legal information, procedural guidance, and assistance
with forms to litigants without legal representation for the purpose of enhancing access to justice,
reducing court congestion and staff overload, and improving case processing efficiency.
SECTION 7. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to annually provide a directed grant to Durham County for
salary enhancements and retention incentives for, and professional development of, court staff to
increase retention of experienced personnel, improve institutional knowledge, and reduce hiring
and training costs for the purpose of ensuring high-quality service to the public.
SECTION 8. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Durham County to the Durham
County Special Proceedings and Estates courtroom with CRAVE hardware to provide for remote
hearing capability, meet other system hardware and software needs, and train personnel to
improve court efficiency for the purposes of modernizing the judiciary, improving data security,
and reducing long-term administrative costs.
SECTION 9. The Department of Transportation shall perform a study that
reevaluates the procedures, policies, and criteria used in the funding of roadway projects and
expansion in relation to rural counties and municipalities impacted by increases in population,
residential development, and traffic congestion. The study shall include evaluating the need for
improvements to how the Department and rural counties and municipalities work together, the
need for increased State funding for new and existing construction and maintenance, and whether
legislation is necessary to ensure that the State Transportation Improvement (STI) project
funding formula recognizes that one size does not fit all and that projects in both rural and urban
areas are prioritized and funded appropriately.
SECTION 10. Sections 1 through 8 of this act become effective July 1, 2025. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 927-First Edition